Maryland, session 2026, SB0797.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–102.3.
(b) The provisions of [§ 15–1005] §§ 15–113(B), 15–1005, AND 15–1005.1 of the
Insurance Article shall apply to managed care organizations in the same manner they apply
to health maintenance organizations.
19–712.
(b) (1) A person who holds a certificate of authority to operate a health
maintenance organization under this subtitle and who enters into any administrative
service provider contract, as defined in § 19–713.2 of this subtitle, with a person or entity
for the provision of health care services to subscribers shall be responsible for all claims or
payments for health care services:
(i) Covered under the subscriber’s contract; and
(ii) Rendered by a provider, who is not the person or entity which
entered into the administrative service provider contract with the health maintenance
organization, pursuant to a referral by a person or entity which entered into the
administrative service provider contract with the health maintenance organization.
(2) Responsibility for claims and payments under this subsection is subject
to the provisions of [§ 15–1005] §§ 15–113(B), 15–1005, AND 15–1005.1 of the Insurance
Article.
Article – Insurance
15–113.
(b) A carrier:
(1) may not reimburse a health care practitioner in an amount less than
the sum or rate negotiated in the carrier’s provider contract with the health care
practitioner; AND
(2) SHALL COMPLY WITH § 15–1005.1 OF THIS TITLE BEFORE
REDUCING A CLAIM SUBMITTED BY A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER TO A LOWER LEVEL
OF EVALUATION AND MANAGEMENT SERVICE CODE OR OTHER SERVICE CODE
RESULTING IN A LOWER PAYMENT FOR SERVICE.

SENATE BILL 797 3
15–1005.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DOWNCODE” MEANS THE UNILATERAL ALTERATION BY AN
INSURER, A NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLAN, OR A HEALTH MAINTENANCE
ORGANIZATION, OR BY ANY ENTITY WORKING ON BEHALF OF AN INSURER, A
NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLAN, OR A HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION,
OF THE LEVEL OF EVALUATION AND MANAGEMENT SERVICE CODE OR ANY OTHER
SERVICE CODE SUBMITTED BY A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER, RESULTING IN A LOWER
PAYMENT.
(3) “HEALTH CARE PROVIDER” MEANS:
(I) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS LICENSED UNDER THE HEALTH
OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE TO PROVIDE HEALTH CARE SERVICES IN THE ORDINARY
COURSE OF BUSINESS OR PRACTICE OF A PROFESSION AND IS A TREATING
PROVIDER OF THE MEMBER;
(II) A HOSPITAL, AS DEFINED IN § 19–301 OF THE HEALTH –
GENERAL ARTICLE; OR
(III) A FREESTANDING MEDICAL FACILITY, AS DEFINED IN §
19–3A–01 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(B) IN PAYING A CLAIM FOR REIMBURSEMENT UNDER § 15–1005 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, AN INSURER, A NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLAN, OR A HEALTH
MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION MAY NOT:
(1) USE A PROCESS, SYSTEM, OR TOOL, INCLUDING ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE, ALGORITHMS, SOFTWARE TOOLS, OR MACHINE LEARNING, TO
DOWNCODE A CLAIM WITHOUT A REVIEW OF CLINICAL DOCUMENTATION AS
REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION;
(2) DOWNCODE A CLAIM BASED SOLELY ON THE REPORTED
DIAGNOSIS CODE;
(3) FOR A CLAIM INVOLVING EMERGENCY SERVICES, AS DEFINED IN §
15–1A–14 OF THIS TITLE, DOWNCODE THE CLAIM BASED ON THE FINAL DIAGNOSIS
RATHER THAN THE SYMPTOMS PRESENTED, AS DOCUMENTED BY A HEALTH CARE
PROVIDER AND MEASURED AGAINST THE STANDARD OF A PRUDENT LAYPERSON; OR

SENATE BILL 797
(4) USE DOWNCODING PRACTICES THAT TARGET HEALTH CARE
PROVIDERS WHO ROUTINELY TREAT PATIENTS WITH COMPLEX OR CHRONIC
CONDITIONS THAT MAY HAVE A GREATER INCIDENCE OF HIGHER EVALUATION AND
MANAGEMENT AND OTHER SERVICE CODES.
(C) (1) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING A CLAIM FOR
REIMBURSEMENT, IF AN INSURER, A NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLAN, OR A
HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION INTENDS ON DOWNCODING THE CLAIM, THE
INSURER, NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLAN, OR HEALTH MAINTENANCE
ORGANIZATION SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE TO THE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER OF THE
INTENT TO DOWNCODE THE CLAIM.
(2) THE NOTICE PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE SPECIFIC REASON FOR DOWNCODING THE CLAIM,
INCLUDING REFERENCE TO CLINICAL CRITERIA AND ESTABLISHED FEDERAL OR
STATE CODING GUIDELINES USED TO JUSTIFY THE DOWNCODING;
(II) THE ORIGINAL CODES SUBMITTED BY THE HEALTH CARE
PROVIDER AND THE REVISED SERVICE CODES SELECTED BY THE INSURER,
NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLAN, OR HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION AND
CORRESPONDING REIMBURSEMENT AMOUNTS; AND
(III) A STATEMENT INFORMING THE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER OF
THE OPPORTUNITY TO RESPOND AND PROVIDE ADDITIONAL DOCUMENTATION:
1. AS NECESSARY TO SUPPORT THE CLAIM; AND
2. WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER THE DATE THE HEALTH CARE
PROVIDER RECEIVED THE NOTICE.
(3) AN INSURER, A NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLAN, OR A HEALTH
MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION MAY REQUEST ADDITIONAL INFORMATION FROM A
HEALTH CARE PROVIDER FOR A CLAIM BEING CONSIDERED FOR DOWNCODING IF
THE INSURER, NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLAN, OR HEALTH MAINTENANCE
ORGANIZATION:
(I) CONFIRMS THAT REQUESTED INFORMATION WAS NOT
PREVIOUSLY SUBMITTED WITH THE CLAIM FOR REIMBURSEMENT BEFORE
REQUESTING ADDITIONAL INFORMATION FROM THE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER; AND

SENATE BILL 797 5
(II) COMPLIES WITH § 15–1005(C)(2)(II) OF THIS SUBTITLE AND
REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER § 15–1003(D)(1)(II) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) A FINAL DETERMINATION OF WHETHER TO DOWNCODE A CLAIM SHALL
BE MADE BY A PHYSICIAN WHO IS:
(1) BOARD CERTIFIED OR ELIGIBLE TO BE BOARD CERTIFIED IN THE
SAME SPECIALTY AS THE SERVICE OR TREATMENT UNDER REVIEW; AND
(2) KNOWLEDGEABLE ABOUT THE HEALTH CARE SERVICE OR
TREATMENT UNDER REVIEW THROUGH ACTUAL CLINICAL EXPERIENCE.
(E) IF AN INSURER, A NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLAN, OR A HEALTH
MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION MAKES A FINAL DECISION TO DOWNCODE A CLAIM,
THE INSURER, NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLAN, OR HEALTH MAINTENANCE
ORGANIZATION SHALL PROVIDE A FINAL NOTICE TO THE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER
THAT OUTLINES THE RIGHT TO APPEAL THE FINAL DECISION IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION.
(F) A FINAL DECISION TO DOWNCODE A CLAIM THAT LEADS TO THE
NONPAYMENT OF A CLAIM OR PORTION OF A CLAIM UNDER § 15–1005 OF THIS
SUBTITLE CONSTITUTES A COVERAGE DECISION FOR PURPOSES OF AN APPEAL
UNDER SUBTITLE 10D OF THIS TITLE.
(G) IN ADDITION TO PENALTIES IMPOSED UNDER § 15–1005 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, AN INSURER, A NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLAN, OR A HEALTH
MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION THAT VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE
NOT EXCEEDING $10,000 FOR EACH VIOLATION.
15–10A–06.
(a) (1) On a quarterly basis, each carrier shall submit to the Commissioner, on
the form the Commissioner requires, a report that describes the following information
aggregated by zip code as required by the Commissioner:
(i) the number of members entitled to health care benefits under a
policy, plan, or certificate issued or delivered in the State by the carrier;
(ii) 1. the number of clean claims for reimbursement processed
by the carrier;
2. THE NUMBER OF NOTICES SENT TO HEALTH CARE
PROVIDERS INDICATING AN INTENT TO DOWNCODE A CLAIM UNDER § 15–1005.1 OF
THIS TITLE; AND

SENATE BILL 797
3. THE NUMBER OF CLAIMS THAT WERE DOWNCODED BY
THE CARRIER;
(iii) the activities of the carrier under this subtitle, including:
1. the outcome of each grievance filed with the carrier;
2. the number and outcomes of cases that were considered
emergency cases under § 15–10A–02(b)(2)(i) of this subtitle;
3. the time within which the carrier made a grievance
decision on each emergency case;
4. the time within which the carrier made a grievance
decision on all other cases that were not considered emergency cases;
5. the number of grievances filed with the carrier that
resulted from an adverse decision involving length of stay for inpatient hospitalization as
related to the medical procedure involved;
6. the number of adverse decisions issued by the carrier
under § 15–10A–02(f) of this subtitle, whether the adverse decision involved a prior
authorization or step therapy protocol, the type of service at issue in the adverse decisions,
and whether an artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool was used in making
the adverse decision;
7. the number of adverse decisions overturned after a
reconsideration request under § 15–10B–06 of this title; and
8. the number of requests made and granted under §
15–831(c)(1) and (2) of this title; and
(iv) the number and outcome of all other cases that are not subject to
activities of the carrier under this subtitle that resulted from an adverse decision involving
the length of stay for inpatient hospitalization as related to the medical procedure involved.
15–10D–02.
(d) (1) A member, a member’s representative, or a health care provider filing
a complaint on behalf of a member may file a complaint with the Commissioner without
first filing an appeal with a carrier [only] if the coverage decision involves an urgent
medical condition, as defined by regulation adopted by the Commissioner, for which care
has not been rendered.

SENATE BILL 797 7
(2) A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER MAY FILE A COMPLAINT WITH THE
COMMISSIONER WITHOUT FIRST FILING AN APPEAL WITH A CARRIER IF THE
COVERAGE DECISION IS THE RESULT OF A FINAL DETERMINATION TO DOWNCODE A
CLAIM UNDER § 15–1005.1.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.